Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2027.08
Annual benefit
adjustment; cost-of-living adjustment calculation method.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter, the board
shall determine the number of retired members or beneficiaries described in
subdivision (4)(b) of this section in the retirement system and an annual
benefit adjustment shall be made by the board for each retired member or beneficiary
under one of the cost-of-living adjustment calculation methods found in subsection
(2), (3), or (4) of this section. Each retired member or beneficiary, if eligible,
shall receive an annual benefit adjustment under the cost-of-living adjustment
calculation method that provides the retired member or beneficiary the greatest
annual benefit adjustment increase. No retired member or beneficiary shall
receive an annual benefit adjustment under more than one of the cost-of-living
adjustment calculation methods provided in this section.

(2) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be adjusted so that the purchasing power of the
benefit being paid is not less than sixty percent of the purchasing power
of the initial benefit. The purchasing power of the initial benefit in any
year following the year in which the initial benefit commenced shall be calculated
by dividing the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics,
Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers factor on
June 30 of the current year by the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners
and Clerical Workers factor on June 30 of the year in which the benefit commenced.
The result shall be multiplied by the product that results when the amount
of the initial benefit is multiplied by sixty percent. In any year in which
applying the adjustment provided in subsection (3) of this section results
in a benefit which would be less than sixty percent of the purchasing power
of the initial benefit as calculated in this subsection, the adjustment shall
instead be equal to the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for
Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers factor from the prior year to the
current year.

(3) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be increased annually by the lesser of (a) the percentage change in the Consumer Price
Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the period between June
30 of the prior year to June 30 of the present year or (b) two
and one-half percent.

(4)(a) The current benefit paid to a retired member or beneficiary
under this subsection shall be calculated by multiplying the retired member's
or beneficiary's total monthly benefit by the lesser of (i) the cumulative
change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers
from the last adjustment of the total monthly benefit of each retired member
or beneficiary through June 30 of the year for which the annual benefit adjustment
is being calculated or (ii) an amount equal to three percent per annum compounded
for the period from the last adjustment of the total monthly benefit of each
retired member or beneficiary through June 30 of the year for which the annual
benefit adjustment is being calculated.

(b) In order for a retired member or beneficiary to receive
the cost-of-living adjustment calculation method in this subsection, the retired
member or beneficiary shall be (i) a retired member or beneficiary who has
been receiving a retirement benefit for at least five years if the member
had at least twenty-five years of creditable service, (ii) a member who has
been receiving a disability retirement benefit for at least five years pursuant
to section 81-2025, or (iii) a beneficiary who has been receiving a death
benefit pursuant to section 81-2026 for at least five years, if the member's
or beneficiary's monthly accrual rate is less than or equal to the minimum
accrual rate as determined by this subsection.

(c) The monthly accrual rate under this subsection is the
retired member's or beneficiary's total monthly benefit divided by the number
of years of creditable service earned by the retired or deceased member.

(d) The total monthly benefit under this subsection is the
total benefit received by a retired member or beneficiary pursuant to the
Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act and previous adjustments made pursuant
to this section or any other provision of the act that grants a benefit or
cost-of-living increase, but the total monthly benefit shall not include sums
received by an eligible retired member or eligible beneficiary from federal
sources.

(e) Beginning July 1, 2010, the minimum accrual
rate under this subsection was forty dollars and sixteen cents. Beginning
July 1, 2011, the minimum accrual rate under this subsection was forty-one
dollars and seventy-nine cents. Beginning July 1, 2012, the minimum accrual
rate under this subsection was forty-two dollars and forty-five cents. Beginning
July 1, 2013, the board shall annually adjust the minimum accrual
rate to reflect the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index
for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers from the last adjustment of the
minimum accrual rate.

(5) Beginning July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter, each
retired member or beneficiary shall receive the sum of the annual benefit
adjustment and such retiree's total monthly benefit less withholding, which
sum shall be the retired member's or beneficiary's adjusted total monthly
benefit. Each retired member or beneficiary shall receive the adjusted total
monthly benefit until the expiration of the annuity option selected by the
member or until the retired member or beneficiary again qualifies for the
annual benefit adjustment, whichever occurs first.

(6) The annual benefit adjustment pursuant to this section
shall not cause a current benefit to be reduced, and a retired member or beneficiary
shall never receive less than the adjusted total monthly benefit until the
annuity option selected by the member expires.

(7) The board shall adjust the annual benefit adjustment
provided in this section so that the cost-of-living adjustment provided to
the retired member or beneficiary at the time of the annual benefit adjustment
does not exceed the change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners
and Clerical Workers for the period between June 30 of the prior year to June
30 of the present year. If the consumer price index used in this section is
discontinued or replaced, a substitute index published by the United States
Department of Labor shall be selected by the board which shall be a reasonable
representative measurement of the cost-of-living for retired employees.

(8) The state shall contribute to the State Patrol Retirement
Fund an annual level dollar payment certified by the board. For the 2011-12
fiscal year through the 2012-13 fiscal year, the annual level dollar payment
certified by the board shall equal 3.04888 percent of six million eight hundred
ninety-five thousand dollars.

Laws 2011, LB509, § 41;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 33.